Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Chapter 7 Procedure at the Polling Place
2-7-114. Voting by paper ballots.

When the voter is to vote by paper ballot, the voter shall then present the ballot application to the judge who is in charge of paper ballots. The judge shall write the ballot number of each ballot the voter is entitled to on the ballot application, give the ballot or ballots to the voter, and give the ballot application to the judge who is assigned to deposit ballots in the ballot box. The judge shall, upon demand of any voter at the time the voter receives the ballot, tell the voter the order of the offices on the ballot.

The voter shall then go to a place where the voter may mark the ballot in complete secrecy and privacy and shall prepare the ballot by making in the appropriate place a cross (X) or other mark opposite the name of the candidate of the voter's choice for each office to be filled, or by filling in the name of the candidate of the voter's choice in the blank space provided, and by making a cross (X) or other mark opposite the answer the voter desires to give on each question. Before leaving the place of secrecy and privacy, the voter shall fold the ballot so that the votes cannot be seen but so that the information printed on the back of the ballot and the numbered stub are plainly visible.

Any voter who fills in or writes in the name of a candidate whose name is not printed on the ballot shall not be required to make a cross (X) or other mark next to such person's name in order for the vote to be counted.

The voter shall state the voter's name and present the folded ballot to the judge assigned to receive and deposit the ballots. The judge shall compare the ballot number on the stub with the ballot number on the voter's ballot application. If the ballot numbers are the same, the judge shall tear off the stub, attach the ballot stub to the voter's application for ballot and direct the voter to deposit the ballot in the ballot box, unless the voter is successfully challenged. The judge shall file all ballot applications and ballot stubs in the order in which they are received. Notwithstanding any other law, the procedure described herein shall govern the voting process in counties using the optical scan voting system.

In counties using an electronic ballot marking system or ballot-on-demand technology approved by the coordinator of elections, a ballot stub number is not required to be preprinted on the paper ballot. The election official shall file all ballot applications in the order in which they are received. When a ballot stub number is not preprinted on the paper ballot, the election commission must reconcile the number of applications issued in the polling place with the number of ballots recorded by the optical scanner used to tabulate the ballots in the polling place. Whenever the total number of applications issued differs from the total number of ballots scanned in a tabulator used in the polling place, the election commission shall complete a written report explaining the difference.

If the voter is voting a provisional ballot pursuant to § 2-7-112(a)(3) and (e), the voter shall state the voter's name and present the folded ballot to the judge assigned to receive and deposit the provisional ballots. The judge shall compare the provisional ballot number on the stub with the provisional ballot number on the voter's ballot application. If the provisional ballot numbers are the same, the judge shall tear off the stub and attach the ballot stub to the voter's application for ballot. The judge shall file all ballot applications and ballot stubs in the order in which they are received. Unless the voter is successfully challenged, the judge shall direct the voter to deposit the provisional ballot into the provisional ballot envelope that contains the provisional ballot affidavit. The judge shall ensure that the provisional ballot affidavit has been completed and signed by the voter and direct the voter to deposit the provisional ballot, in its envelope, in an absentee ballot box that satisfies the requirements for absentee ballot boxes and that has been locked pursuant to § 2-6-311.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-714; Acts 1981, ch. 478, § 17; 1997, ch. 558, § 16; 2003, ch. 352, § 4; 2018, ch. 749, § 1; 2020, ch. 655, § 2.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (c) which read: “(c)(1) The voter shall state the voter's name and present the folded ballot to the judge assigned to receive and deposit the ballots. The judge shall compare the ballot number on the stub with the ballot number on the voter's ballot application. If the ballot numbers are the same, the judge shall tear off and destroy the stub and deposit the ballot in the ballot box unless the voter is successfully challenged. The judge shall file all ballot applications in the order in which they are received.“(2) If the voter is voting pursuant to §2-7-112(a)(3), the voter shall state the voter's name and present the folded ballot to the judge assigned to receive and deposit the provisional ballots. The judge shall compare the provisional ballot number on the stub with the provisional ballot number on the voter's ballot application. The judge shall file all ballot applications in the order in which they are received. If the provisional ballot numbers are the same, the judge shall tear off and destroy the provisional ballot stub and deposit the provisional ballot in the provisional ballot envelope which contains the provisional ballot affidavit. The judge shall assure that the provisional ballot affidavit has been completed and signed by the voter. The provisional ballot, in its envelope, shall be deposited in an absentee ballot box that satisfies the requirements of the absentee ballot boxes and has been locked pursuant to §2-6-311.”

The 2020 amendment rewrote (c)(2), which read: “In counties using a ballot marking device, or any other electronic ballot marking system, after the voter completes the application for ballot and the election official records the ballot stub number on the application for ballot, the election official shall attach the ballot stub to the voter's application for ballot. The election official shall file all ballot applications and ballot stubs in the order in which they are received.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 749, § 2. May 2, 2018.

Acts 2020, ch. 655, § 7. April 2, 2020.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 12.

2-7-115. Residence requirements — Primary election voting requirements.

A voter may vote only in the precinct where the voter resides and is registered, but if a registered voter has, at any time prior to voting, changed residence to another place inside the county, the voter must vote pursuant to the provisions of § 2-7-140. If a registered voter has, within ninety (90) days before a state primary or general election or federal primary or general election, changed residence to another place inside Tennessee but outside the county where the voter is registered, the voter may vote in the polling place where the voter is registered. If the voter has, within ninety (90) days before an election, changed name by marriage or otherwise, the voter may vote in the polling place where the voter is registered or is entitled to vote under § 2-7-140.

A registered voter is entitled to vote in a primary election for offices for which the voter is qualified to vote at the polling place where the voter is registered if:

The voter is a bona fide member of and affiliated with the political party in whose primary the voter seeks to vote; or

At the time the voter seeks to vote, the voter declares allegiance to the political party in whose primary the voter seeks to vote and states that the voter intends to affiliate with that party.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1974, ch. 801, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-715; Acts 1997, ch. 550, § 9; 2000, ch. 756, § 14.

Cross-References. General assembly authorized to require voters to vote in the precinct where they reside, Tenn. Const., art. IV, § 1.

Primary elections, title 2, ch. 13.

Residents of an area ceded to the federal government entitled to registration, §2-2-104.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

2-7-116. Assistance to disabled, illiterate or blind voters — Certified record — Assistance by person convicted of voter fraud prohibited.

A voter who claims, by reason of illiteracy or physical disability other than blindness, to be unable to mark the ballot to vote as the voter wishes and who, in the judgment of the officer of elections, is so disabled or illiterate, may:

Where voting machines are used, have the ballot marked on a voting machine or on a paper ballot subject to the provisions of § 2-7-117 by any person of the voter's selection, or by one of the judges of the voter's choice in the presence of either a judge of a different political party or, if such judge is not available, an election official of a different political party; or

Where voting machines are not used, have the ballot marked by any person of the voter's selection or by one of the judges of the voter's choice in the presence of either a judge of a different political party or, if such judge is not available, an election official of a different political party.

The officer of elections shall keep a record of each such declaration, including the name of the voter and of the person marking the ballot and, if marked by a judge, the name of the judge or other official in whose presence the ballot was marked. The record shall be certified and kept with the poll books on forms to be provided by the coordinator of elections.

A voter who claims, by reason of blindness, to be unable to mark the ballot to vote as the voter wishes and who, in the judgment of the officer of elections, is blind, may:

Where voting machines are used, have the ballot marked on a voting machine or on a paper ballot subject to the provisions of § 2-7-117 by any person of the voter's selection or by one of the judges of the voter's choice in the presence of either a judge of a different political party or, if such judge is not available, an election official of a different political party; or

Where voting machines are not used, have the ballot marked by any person of the voter's selection or by one of the judges of the voter's choice in the presence of either a judge of a different political party or, if such judge is not available, an election official of a different political party.

The officer of elections shall keep a record of each such declaration, including the name of the voter and of the person marking the ballot and, if marked by a judge, the name of the judge or other official in whose presence the ballot was marked. The record shall be certified and kept with the poll books on forms to be provided by the coordinator of elections.

A voter, who is physically disabled or who is visibly pregnant or frail, may request the officer of elections at the polling place for permission to be moved to the front of any line. In accordance with policies and procedures promulgated by the state coordinator of elections and at the discretion of the officer of elections, the requesting voter may be moved to the front of any line at the polling place.

A temporary sign, restating the language of subdivision (c)(1), shall be prominently and strategically posted at the polling place whenever voting is underway at the polling place.

Notwithstanding this section or any other law to the contrary, a person convicted of voter fraud in any state shall not assist a person in casting a vote.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 2, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-716; Acts 1997, ch. 122, § 1; 1997, ch. 558, § 8; 1997, ch. 558, §§ 8, 9; 1998, ch. 719, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 301, § 1; 2019, ch. 271, § 4.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 271, § 5. April 30, 2019.

Cross-References. Ballot supplies for persons with visual impairments, §2-5-218.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, §§ 12, 23.

2-7-117. Write-in procedure where voting machines are used.

Where voting machines are used, any voter desiring to cast a ballot for a candidate whose name is not on the voting machine ballot may request a paper ballot to be furnished by the ballot judge. This request must be made before operating a voting machine, and a voter after receiving a paper ballot may not enter a voting machine.

The procedure for casting a write-in ballot in counties which use or have a C.E.S., Inc., Votomatic or other comparable punch card voting system shall be governed by rules and regulations promulgated by the coordinator of elections and the state election commission relative to the use of punch card voting systems.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-717; Acts 1988, ch. 672, § 4.

Collateral References.

Challenges to Write-in Ballots and Certification of Write-in Candidates. 75 A.L.R.6th 311.

2-7-118. Time limit for voting — Removal of voter.

No voter who is voting without assistance may remain in a voting machine booth or occupy a voting compartment for more than five (5) minutes if other voters are waiting or more than ten (10) minutes in any event.

If a voter refuses to leave after such time elapses, the officer of elections shall have the voter removed.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-718; Acts 2004, ch. 480, § 9.

2-7-119. Machine out of order — Procedure.

If a voting machine being used in an election becomes out of order, it shall be repaired if possible or another machine substituted as promptly as possible.

If repair or substitution cannot be made and other machines at the polling place cannot handle the voters, the paper ballots provided for the polling place shall be used and, if necessary, ballots shall be provided under § 2-7-108.

If a voting machine becomes out of order while it is being used, the crosses (X) shall be cleared from its face by the names of candidates and by questions. The voter may then vote on another machine or by paper ballot as the judges decide.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-719.

2-7-120. Spoiled ballots.

If any voter spoils a paper ballot, the voter may obtain others, one (1) at a time, not exceeding three (3) in all, upon returning each spoiled one. The spoiled ballots shall be placed in an envelope marked “Spoiled Ballots.”

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-720.

2-7-121. Rejected ballots.

No person may take any ballot from the polling place before the close of the polls. If a voter refuses to give the paper ballot to the judge to be deposited in the ballot box after marking it, the officer of elections shall require that the ballot be surrendered to the officer and shall deposit it in a sealed envelope marked “Rejected” with the person's name, the reason for rejection, and the officer's signature.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-721.

2-7-122. Management of machine during voting.

The voting machine operator shall inspect the face of the machine after every voter has voted to ascertain that the ballot labels are in their proper places and that the machine has not been injured or tampered with. The operator shall remove any campaign literature left in the machine booth.

During the election the door or other compartment of the machine may not be unlocked or opened or the counters exposed except by the voting machine technician or other authorized person, a statement of which shall be made and signed by the voting machine technician or authorized person and attached to the returns.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-722.

2-7-123. Challenges to right to vote — Oath of challenged voter.

If any person's right to vote is challenged by any other person present at the polling place, the judges shall present the challenge to the person and decide the challenge after administering the following oath to the challenged voter: “I swear (affirm) that I will give true answers to questions asked about my right to vote in the election I have applied to vote in.” A person who refuses to take the oath may not vote.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-723.

2-7-124. Challenges — Grounds and procedure.

A person offering to vote may be challenged only on the grounds that the person:

Is not a registered voter in Tennessee and did not vote a provisional ballot;

Is not a resident of the precinct where the person seeks to vote;

Is not the registered voter under whose name the person has applied to vote;

Has already voted in the election; or

Has become ineligible to vote in the election being conducted at the polling place since the person registered.

The judges may ask any question which is material to deciding the challenge and may put under oath and ask questions of such persons as they deem necessary to their decision. The judges shall ask the administrator of elections to check the original permanent registration records if the voter claims to be registered but has no duplicate permanent registration record.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-724; Acts 1997, ch. 550, § 10; 2003, ch. 352, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-7-125. Challenged voter — Voting procedure.

If the judges determine unanimously that the person is not entitled to vote, the person shall vote by paper ballot and the person's ballot shall be deposited in a sealed envelope marked “Rejected” with the person's name, the reason for rejection, and the signatures of the judges written on it.

If the judges do not agree unanimously to rejection, the person shall be permitted to vote as if unchallenged.

In either case the challenge and outcome shall be noted on the back of the voter's duplicate permanent registration record and on the poll lists.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-725.

2-7-126. Challenge on ground of party membership.

A person offering to vote in a primary may also be challenged on the ground that the person is not qualified under §2-7-115(b). Such a challenge shall be disposed of under the procedure of §§2-7-123 —2-7-125 by the judge or judges and the other election officials of the party in whose primary the voter applied to vote, with a total of three (3) to decide the challenge.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-726.

2-7-127. Closing of the polling place.

At the time set for the closing of the polling place, the officer of elections shall place one (1) of the election officials at the end of the line of persons waiting to vote. No other person may then get in line to vote. The polls shall be closed as soon as all persons in the line ahead of the election official have voted regardless of when the polls opened.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-727.

Attorney General Opinions. Absentee and early voting ballots may not be totaled—and thus may not be released—until all polling places in the county are closed. Under T.C.A. §2-7-127, polling places are closed only when all persons waiting in line to vote at the time set for closing have voted. OAG 19-12, 2019 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (8/26/2019).

2-7-128. Duties after closing the polls.

The registrars shall, immediately after the polls close, cross (X) out the remaining space on incomplete poll list sheets so that no additional names can be written in and shall number those sheets serially and place them in the poll book binders.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-728.

2-7-129. Unused paper ballots — Disposal.

Immediately after the polls close and before any ballot box or voting machine is opened to count votes, the judges shall tear all unused paper ballots in half without tearing off the numbered stubs. The portion without the stubs may then be discarded, and the portion with the stubs shall be preserved.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-729.

2-7-130. Locking of machine — Canvass and proclamation of votes on voting machines.

After the polls have closed and after disposal of unused paper ballots, the judges shall then lock and seal the voting machines against voting. The judges shall sign a certificate on the tally sheets, stating that:

Each machine has been locked against voting and sealed;

The number of voters as shown on the public counters;

The numbers on the seals; and

The numbers registered on the protective counters.

The judges shall then open the counter compartment in the presence of the watchers and all other persons who are present, giving full view of all the counter numbers. One (1) of the judges, under the scrutiny of a judge of a different political party, in the order of the offices as their titles are arranged on the machine, shall read aloud in distinct tones the designating number and letter, if any, on each counter for each candidate's name and the result as shown by the counter numbers. The judge shall in the same manner announce the vote on each question. The counters shall not in the case of presidential electors be read consecutively along the party row or column, but shall always be read along the office columns or rows, completing the canvass for each office. The total shown beside the words “Electors for (giving the name) candidate for President and for (giving the name) candidate for Vice President” shall operate as a vote for all the candidates for presidential electors for those candidates for president and vice president.

The vote as registered shall be entered on the duplicate tally sheets in ink by the precinct registrars in the same order on the space which has the same designating number and letter, if any. The minority party precinct registrar shall then read aloud the figures from the tally sheet filled in by the majority party precinct registrar for verification by the minority party judge.

After proclamation of the vote on the voting machines, ample opportunity shall be given to any person present to compare the results so announced with the counter dials of the machine.

The judges shall make corrections.

When voting machines are employed such as those of Shoup manufacture, which achieve the effect of seals by the utilization of master keys, sealing the machines upon the close of polls shall be unnecessary.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1976, ch. 416, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-730.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 14.

2-7-131. Counting of ballots.

After the requirements of § 2-7-130 have been met or, where voting machines are not used, after the polling place closes, the judges shall open the ballot box in the polling place in the presence of the watchers and all other persons who are present.

The judges shall alternate in drawing ballots from the box and reading aloud within sight of the other judges the names of the persons who have been voted for on each ballot, and the two (2) precinct registrars shall record the votes at the same time for counting on record sheets. The completed record sheets shall be bound in the poll books.

Two (2) judges of different political parties shall then compute the votes for each candidate and each position on a question and shall enter the totals for the paper ballots on the duplicate tally sheets in ink. The third judge shall verify the computation and entry of the totals.

The paper ballot vote totals shall then be announced.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(d), if paper ballots are used pursuant to § 2-5-206(e)(2), the county election commission may have such paper ballots counted by the central absentee ballot counting board pursuant to § 2-6-302, after the ballot boxes have been transported to the county election commission office.

The coordinator of elections may promulgate rules and procedures to implement this subsection (e).

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(d), the county election commission may instruct the officer of elections and a judge of a different political party to transport the locked ballot box or boxes containing voted paper ballots to the county election commission office to have such paper ballots counted by the central absentee ballot counting board pursuant to § 2-6-302. The central absentee ballot counting board utilized in accordance with this subsection (f) may be the same members as a counting board that has already been appointed in like manner to the absentee ballot counting board established under § 2-6-302 or it may contain different members that have been appointed in like manner to such a board. The county election commission may only exercise this option if the ballot box or boxes used in the polling place satisfy the requirements of the absentee ballot boxes and have been locked pursuant to § 2-6-311.

Where the write-in feature of a direct recording electronic voting machine has been used, the county election commission may instruct the officer of elections and a judge of a different political party to transport the locked ballot box or boxes containing the voting machine printer tape containing the write-in names to the county election commission office to have such paper ballots counted by the central absentee ballot counting board pursuant to § 2-6-302. The central absentee ballot counting board utilized in accordance with this subsection (f) may be the same members as a counting board that has already been appointed in like manner to the absentee ballot counting board established under § 2-6-302 or it may contain different members that have been appointed in like manner to such a board.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-731; Acts 1997, ch. 287, § 1; 2003, ch. 352, § 6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 14.

2-7-132. Completion of duplicate tally sheets — Certification — Final proclamation of vote.

After the completion of the requirements of § 2-7-131, the duplicate tally sheets shall then be completed, showing the total number of votes cast for each office and question, the total number of votes cast for each candidate, including write-in candidates, and for each position on a question.

The duplicate tally sheets shall be certified correct and signed by each judge and by the officer of elections and shall be placed in the poll books.

A final proclamation shall then be made as to the total vote received by each candidate and for each position on questions.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-732.

2-7-133. Ballots which may be counted.

Only ballots provided in accordance with this title may be counted. The judges shall write “Void” on others and sign them.

If the voter marks more names than there are persons to be elected to an office, or if for any reason it is impossible to determine the voter's choice for any office to be filled or on a question, the voter's ballot shall not be counted for such office and shall be marked “Uncounted” beside the office and be signed by the judges. It shall be counted so far as it is properly marked or so far as it is possible to determine the voter's choice.

If two (2) ballots are rolled up together or are folded together, they shall not be counted. The judges shall write on them “Void” and the reason and sign them.

Any ballot marked by the voter for identification shall not be counted. The judges shall write on it “Void” and the reason and sign it.

Ballots which are not counted shall be kept together and shall be bundled separately from the ballots which are counted.

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if a voter marks a paper or optical scan ballot with a cross, “x”, checkmark or any other appropriate mark within the square, circle or oval to the right of the candidate's name, or any place within the space in which the name appears, indicating an intent to vote for that candidate, it is a vote for the candidate whose name it is opposite. Underlining or circling the candidate's name would also constitute a vote. Any apparent erasure of a mark next to the name of a candidate may not be counted as a vote for that candidate if the voter makes another mark next to the name of one (1) or more different candidates for the same office and counting of the mark would result in an excess number of votes cast for the office.

If a voter casts more than one (1) vote for the same candidate for the same office, the first vote is valid and the remaining votes are invalid.

Any person attempting to be elected by write-in ballots shall complete a notice requesting such person's ballots be counted in each county of the district no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, fifty (50) days before the general election. Such person shall only have votes counted in counties where such notice was completed and timely filed. The notice shall be on a form prescribed by the coordinator of elections and shall not require signatures of any person other than the write-in candidate requesting ballots be counted. The coordinator of elections shall distribute such form to the county election commissions. Upon timely receiving the notice required by this subsection (i), the county election commission shall promptly inform the state coordinator of elections, the registry of election finance, as well as all other candidates participating in the affected election. A write-in candidate may withdraw the notice by filing a letter of withdrawal in the same manner as the original notice was filed no later than the fifth day before the election.

A candidate defeated in a primary election shall not complete a notice requesting write-in ballots to be counted in the general election under subdivision (i)(1), and any write-in votes cast for the candidate in the general election must not be counted.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-733; Acts 2001, ch. 413, § 1; 2001, ch. 465, §§ 2-4; 2003, ch. 307, § 4; 2005, ch. 302, § 1; 2007, ch. 125, § 6; 2008, ch. 928, § 15; 2009, ch. 218, § 6; 2019, ch. 128, § 1; 2019, ch. 250, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 465, § 1, provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as “The 2000 Presidential Election Debacle Reform Bill of 2001.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by ch. 128 added (i)(2).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 250, effective October 1, 2019, deleted former (f) which read: “(f) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a vote shall be counted if a recount is undertaken on a punchcard ballot under the following conditions:“(1) When at least two (2) corners of the chad are detached;“(2) Light is visible through the hole; or“(3) An indentation of the chad from the stylus or other object is present and indicates a clearly ascertainable intent of the voter to vote.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 128, § 2. April 9, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 250, § 9. October 1, 2019.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 12.

Attorney General Opinions. Notice requirement for write-in candidates is constitutionally defensible, OAG 04-023 (2/12/04).

2-7-134. Return of keys at close of election.

After the tally sheets have been certified, the judges shall close and lock the voting machines and enclose the keys for each voting machine in a separate sealed envelope on which they shall certify the number of the machine, the polling place where it has been used, the number on the seal, and the numbers registered on the public and protective counters.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-734.

2-7-135. Lists of election officials prepared by officer of elections.

The officer of elections shall prepare and certify to the county election commission a list of all election officials who served at the polling place and their official positions. The list shall be signed by each official.

The officer of elections shall certify to the county election commission the names of those persons appointed as officials for the polling place before the election who failed to appear and discharge the duties of office.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-735.

2-7-136. Public announcement of results — Certification of results on demand of any candidate or watcher.

When the certification of the tally sheets is complete, the officer of elections shall publicly announce the results and shall, on demand of any candidate or watcher present, furnish such person a certified copy of the results. The certificate shall include the names of all candidates appearing on the ballot, the number of votes received by each and the number of votes for and against each question, including separately the total number of votes cast for each by voting machine and by paper ballot. The certificate shall be signed by the officer of elections and the judges and may be used as competent evidence in case of a contest regardless of what tribunal is hearing the contest.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-736.

2-7-137. Items to be locked in ballot box after certification of the completed tally sheets.

After certification of the completed tally sheets and the performance of the other duties of this chapter, the officer of elections shall have the following items placed in the ballot box or boxes which shall then be locked:

The bound bundles of paper ballots;

The record of voter assistance;

The envelopes containing spoiled ballots;

The envelopes containing rejected ballots;

The poll books;

The bound applications for ballots;

The portions of unused paper ballots containing the numbered stubs;

The envelopes containing the voting machine keys; and

The ballot box keys.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-737; Acts 1982, ch. 871, § 1.

Cross-References. Locking absentee ballot boxes, §2-6-311.

2-7-138. Delivery of locked ballot box and supplies or equipment to county election commission.

The officer of elections, accompanied by either a judge or precinct registrar of another political party, shall immediately deliver the locked ballot box or boxes and remaining election supplies or equipment except the voting machines to the county election commission.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-738.

2-7-139. Removal of supplies from polling place prohibited.

No election supplies, ballots or equipment may be removed from a polling place from the opening of the polls until the requirements of §2-7-137 have been met except that items which have been delivered to the wrong polling place may be transferred to the correct one.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-739.

2-7-140. Procedures for certain inactive voters.

Voters whose registration is in inactive status because of a failure to respond to a confirmation notice described in § 2-2-106(c) and voters who have changed their address of residence to a new address within the county of registration shall be required to vote under the procedures of this section.

An inactive voter who has not moved or any registered voter of the county who has changed residence to a new address within the same voting precinct shall be required to make a written affirmation of such voter's current address and that the voter is entitled to vote before voting. This affirmation shall be made on a standard form provided by the county election commission and shall be made before the officer of elections at the voter's polling place or the appropriate election official at an early voting site. The voter may then vote using the same method as any other voter at the polling place.

A registered voter of the county who has changed residence to a new address within the county of registration but outside such voter's former voting precinct shall be required to make a written affirmation of the voter's current address and that the voter is entitled to vote before voting;

If a voter under this subsection (c) appears at an early voting location and makes the proper affirmation, the election official shall allow the voter to vote the ballot for the voter's new precinct of residence using the same method as any other voter at the polling place;

If a voter under this subsection (c) appears at such voter's former polling place, the voter cannot cast any ballot at that location. An election official shall make a determination of the voter's new polling place and inform the voter of the appropriate place to vote. The voter shall be required to make a written affirmation of the voter's current address and that the voter is entitled to vote. The official at the voter's former polling location shall indicate on the affirmation that the person has not been allowed to vote at that location and shall give the voter a copy of the form to take to such voter's new polling location. Upon presenting that affirmation at the new polling location and verification that the new address is within that precinct, the voter shall be allowed to vote using the same method as any other voter at the polling place;

A county election commission may establish a centrally located site or sites to be designated by such commission for voters voting under this subdivision (c)(2);

If a county election commission elects to establish a centrally located site or sites, then the official at such former polling location shall notify the voter that the voter has the option to vote either at the new polling place or at the centrally located site or sites. If a central location is other than the county election commission office, then such centrally located site shall be equipped with computer capabilities linked to the county election commission office to allow the voter's records to be changed or corrected in the same manner as if the voter were to appear at the county election commission office on election day in order that the voter may cast the appropriate ballot;

If a voter under this subsection (c) appears at a polling location where the voter is not currently registered, and does not have a copy of the form described in subdivision (c)(2), the election official shall make a determination as to whether that voter's new address is within the voting precinct for that polling location. If the voter now resides in that precinct, the voter shall be required to make a written affirmation of the voter's current address and that the voter is entitled to vote. The fact that this person is a registered voter must be confirmed by the county election commission before this person's vote is counted.

If a voter described in subsection (a) applies for an absentee ballot, the voter shall fill out the appropriate portion of the absentee application to affirm the voter's address and that the voter is entitled to vote. This affirmation would not have to be made in front of an election official. Upon receiving a proper application, the administrator of elections shall send the voter a ballot for the precinct where the voter now resides and update the registration based upon the affirmation as necessary.

Acts 1997, ch. 550, § 2; 2003, ch. 307, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.